hr-HR: Elektronika > Pribor za elektroniku > Računalne komponente > Dijelovi prijenosnog računala: Ventilatori i rashladna tijela za prijenosna računala; Šarke za prijenosna računala; Kućišta i rubovi za prijenosna računala; Matične i logičke ploče za prijenosna računala; Zamjenski kabeli za prijenosna računala; Zamjenske tipkovnice za prijenosna računala; Zamjenski zasloni prijenosnih računala; Zamjenski zvučnici za prijenosna računala; Zamjenske dodirne pločice za prijenosna računala; Digitalizatori zaslona prijenosnih računala
ko: 전자기기 > 전자기기 부대용품 > 컴퓨터 구성품 > 노트북 부품: 노트북 쿨링 팬 및 히트싱크; 노트북 힌지; 노트북 하우징/트림; 노트북 메인보드 및 로직 보드; 노트북 교체 케이블; 노트북 교체 키보드; 노트북 교체 스크린; 노트북 교체 스피커; 노트북 교체용 터치패드; 노트북 액정 디지타이저
fr: Appareil électronique > Accessoires électroniques > Composants d’ordinateur > Composants d’ordinateur portable: Ventilateurs et dissipateurs thermiques pour ordinateur portable; Charnières pour ordinateurs portables; Boîtiers et contours pour ordinateurs portables; Cartes mères et cartes logiques pour ordinateur portable; Câbles de rechange pour ordinateurs portables; Claviers de remplacement pour ordinateurs portables; Écrans de remplacement pour ordinateurs portables; Haut-parleurs de rechange pour ordinateurs portables; Pavés tactiles de remplacement pour ordinateur portable; Numériseurs à écrans d’ordinateurs portables
sl-SI: Elektronika > Elektronski dodatki > Računalniške komponente > Deli za prenosne računalnike: Hladilni ventilatorji in hladilniki za prenosnike; Tečaji za prenosne računalnike; Ohišja in okvirji za prenosne računalnike; Matične plošče za prenosnike; Nadomestni kabli za prenosne računalnike; Nadomestne tipkovnice za prenosne računalnike; Nadomestni zasloni za prenosne računalnike; Nadomestni zvočniki za prenosne računalnike; Nadomestne sledilne ploščice za prenosnike; Digitalizatorji zaslona prenosnega računalnika
sk-SK: Elektronika > Elektronické príslušenstvo > Počítačové komponenty > Časti prenosných počítačov: Chladiace ventilátory a chladiče notebookov; Pánty prenosných počítačov; Kryty a výbava pre prenosné počítače; Základné dosky a logické dosky notebookov; Náhradné káble k prenosným počítačom; Náhradné klávesnice pre prenosné počítače; Náhradné obrazovky pre prenosné počítače; Náhradné reproduktory pre prenosné počítače; Náhradné touchpady notebookov; Digitalizátory obrazovky prenosných počítačov
it: Elettronica > Accessori dispositivi elettronici > Componenti per computer > Ricambi per laptop: Ventole di raffreddamento e dissipatori del laptop; Cardini per laptop; Custodie e involucri per laptop; Schede madri e schede logiche del laptop; Cavi di ricambio per computer portatile; Tastiere sostitutive per laptop; Schermi sostitutivi per laptop; Altoparlanti di ricambio per computer portatile; Touchpad di ricambio del laptop; Digitalizzatori per computer portatili
hu: Elektronika > Elektronikai kiegészítők > Számítógép-komponensek > Laptopalkatrészek: Laptop-hűtőventilátorok és -hűtőbordák; Laptopzsanérok; Laptopházak és -burkolatok; Laptop-alaplapok és logikai lapok; Laptop-cserekábelek; Laptop-cserebillentyűzetek; Laptop-csereképernyők; Laptop-cserehangszórók; Laptop-csereérintőpadok; Laptop-képernyő digitalizálók
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > อุปกรณ์อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > ส่วนประกอบคอมพิวเตอร์ > อะไหล่แล็ปท็อป: พัดลมระบายความร้อนและฮีทซิงค์แล็ปท็อป; บานพับแล็ปท็อป; กรอบแล็ปท็อป; เมนบอร์ดและบอร์ดควบคุมแล็ปท็อป; เคเบิลอะไหล่สำหรับแล็ปท็อป; อะไหล่แป้นพิมพ์สำหรับแล็ปท็อป; จออะไหล่สำหรับแล็ปท็อป; ลำโพงอะไหล่สำหรับแล็ปท็อป; ทัชแพดแล็ปท็อปทดแทน; ตัวแปลงหน้าจอแล็ปท็อปเป็นดิจิทัล
da: Elektronik > Elektronik – tilbehør > Computerkomponenter > Bærbar computer – dele: Køleventilatorer og køleplader til bærbare computere; Bærbar computer – hængsler; Bærbar computer – kabinetter; Bundkort og logic boards til bærbare computere; Kabler til bærbare computere; Bærbar computer – tastaturer; Bærbar computer – skærme; Integrerbare højttalere til bærbare computere; Ekstra touchpads til bærbare computere; Digitaliseringsenheder til bærbare computere
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Acessórios para eletrônicos > Componentes para computador > Peças para laptops: Coolers e dissipadores de calor para notebook; Dobradiças para laptops; Carcaças para laptops; Placas-mãe e logic boards para notebook; Cabos de substituição para laptops; Teclados de reposição para laptops; Monitores de reposição para laptops; Alto-falantes de reposição para laptops; Touchpads de reposição para notebook; Digitalizadores de tela para laptops
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Acessórios eletrónicos > Componentes informáticos > Peças de portátil: Ventoinhas e dissipadores de calor para portátil; Dobradiças de portátil; Caixas e acabamentos para portátil; Placas-mãe e placas lógicas para portátil; Cabos de substituição de portátil; Teclados de substituição de portátil; Ecrãs de substituição de portátil; Colunas de substituição de portátil; Touchpads de substituição para portátil; Digitadores de ecrã de portátil
ro-RO: Electronice > Accesorii electronice > Componente calculatoare > Piese pentru laptopuri: Ventilatoare și radiatoare pentru laptop; Balamale pentru laptopuri; Carcase și decorațiuni laptopuri; Plăci de bază și plăci logice pentru laptop; Cabluri de schimb pentru laptopuri; Tastaturi de schimb pentru laptopuri; Ecrane de schimb pentru laptopuri; Difuzoare de schimb pentru laptopuri; Touchpaduri de înlocuire pentru laptop; Digitizoare de ecran pentru laptopuri
bg-BG: Електроника > Аксесоари за електроника > Компютърни компоненти > Части за лаптоп: Охлаждащи вентилатори и радиатори за лаптоп; Панти за лаптоп; Корпуси и лайсни за лаптопи; Системни платки за лаптоп; Резервни кабели за лаптоп; Резервни клавиатури за лаптоп; Резервни екрани за лаптоп; Резервни говорители за лаптоп; Резервни тъчпади за лаптоп; Дигитайзери за екрани на лаптоп
ru: Электроника > Аксессуары для электроники > Компьютерные компоненты > Запчасти для ноутбуков: Вентиляторы охлаждения и радиаторы для ноутбуков; Петли для ноутбуков; Корпусы и рамки для ноутбуков; Материнские платы и логические платы для ноутбуков; Кабели для ноутбуков; Клавиатуры для ноутбуков; Экраны для ноутбуков; Динамики для ноутбуков; Сменные тачпады для ноутбуков; Дигитайзеры для экранов ноутбуков
es: Electrónica > Accesorios electrónicos > Componentes para computadoras > Repuestos para portátiles: Ventiladores de enfriamiento y disipadores de calor para portátil; Bisagras para portátiles; Carcasas de portátiles; Placas base y tarjetas lógicas de portátil; Cables de repuesto para portátiles; Teclados de repuesto para portátiles; Pantallas de repuesto para portátiles; Altavoces de repuesto para portátiles; Almohadillas táctiles de reemplazo para portátil; Digitalizadores para pantallas de portátiles
de: Elektronik > Elektronisches Zubehör > Computerkomponenten > Laptopteile: Laptop-Kühlventilatoren und -Kühlkörper; Laptop-Scharniere; Laptopgehäuse; Laptop-Hauptplatinen und -Logikplatinen; Laptop-Ersatzkabel; Laptop-Ersatztastaturen; Laptop-Ersatzbildschirme; Laptop-Ersatzlautsprecher; Laptop-Ersatz-Touchpads; Laptop-Bildschirmdigitalisierer
lt-LT: Elektronika > Elektronikos priedai > Kompiuterių komponentai > Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių dalys: Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių aušinimo ventiliatoriai ir radiatoriai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių lankstai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių korpusai ir apdaila; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių pagrindinės plokštės; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių atsarginiai kabeliai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių atsarginės klaviatūros; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių atsarginiai ekranai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių atsarginiai garsiakalbiai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių pakeičiamieji jutikliniai kilimėliai; Nešiojamųjų kompiuterių ekrano skaitmenintuvai
pl: Elektronika > Akcesoria elektroniczne > Elementy komputera > Części do laptopów: Wentylatory chłodzące i radiatory do laptopów; Zawiasy do laptopów; Obudowy do laptopów; Płyty główne i płyty logiczne do laptopów; Kable do laptopów; Zapasowe klawiatury do laptopów; Zapasowe ekrany do laptopów; Zapasowe głośniki do laptopów; Zamienne touchpady laptopa; Digitizery do laptopów
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 电子配件 > 计算机组件 > 笔记本电脑部件: 笔记本电脑散热风扇和散热片; 笔记本电脑合页; 笔记本外壳; 笔记本电脑主板和逻辑板; 笔记本电脑替换电源线; 笔记本电脑更换键盘; 笔记本电脑屏幕替换; 笔记本电脑扬声器替换; 笔记本电脑替换触摸板; 笔记本电脑触控感应层
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Phụ kiện thiết bị điện tử > Linh kiện máy tính > Linh kiện máy tính xách tay: Quạt làm mát và tản nhiệt laptop; Bản lề laptop; Khung vỏ máy tính xách tay; Bảng mạch chủ và bảng logic laptop; Cáp dự phòng cho laptop; Bàn phím thay thế của máy tính xách tay; Màn hình máy tính xách tay thay thế; Loa máy tính xách tay thay thế; Bàn cảm ứng thay thế laptop; Bộ số hóa màn hình máy tính xách tay
ja: 電子機器 > 電気製品関連用品・PC周辺機器 > PC部品・周辺機器 > ノートPC用パーツ: ノートパソコン冷却ファン・ヒートシンク; ノートPC用ヒンジ; ノート PC用シェルケース; ノートパソコンマザーボード・ロジックボード; ノートPC用ケーブル; ノートPC用キーボード; ノートPC用液晶パネル; ノートPC用スピーカー; ノートパソコン交換用タッチパッド; ノートPC用スクリーンデジタイザ
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Αξεσουάρ ηλεκτρονικών συσκευών > Εξαρτήματα υπολογιστή > Ανταλλακτικά Laptop: Ανεμιστήρες και ψύκτρες για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Αρθρωτές φορητού υπολογιστή (Laptop); Περιβλήματα & διακοσμητικά στοιχεία για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Μητρικές πλακέτες για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Αντικατάσταση καλωδίων για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Ανταλλακτικά πληκτρολόγια για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Ανταλλακτικές οθόνες για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Ανταλλακτικές ηχεία για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Χειριστήρια αφής αντικατάστασης για φορητούς υπολογιστές; Ψηφιοποιητές οθόνης για φορητούς υπολογιστές
sv: Elektronik > Elektroniktillbehör > Datorkomponenter > Delar för bärbara datorer: Kylfläktar och kylflänsar för bärbara datorer; Gångjärn till bärbara datorer; Höljen och stöd för bärbara datorer; Moderkort och logikkort för bärbara datorer; Reservkablar för laptops; Ersättningstangentbord för bärbara datorer; Ersättningsskärmar för bärbara datorer; Ersättningshögtalare för laptops; Ersättningspekplattor för bärbara datorer; Digitaliserare för laptopskärmar
nb: Elektronikk > Elektronikktilbehør > Datamaskinkomponenter > Deler til bærbare datamaskiner: Kjølevifter og kjøleribber til bærbar datamaskin; Hengsler til bærbare datamaskiner; Kabinetter og eksterne deler til bærbare datamaskiner; Hovedkort og logikkort til bærbar datamaskin; Erstatningskabler til bærbare datamaskiner; Erstatningstastaturer til bærbare datamaskiner; Erstatningsskjermer til bærbare datamaskiner; Erstatningshøyttalere til bærbare datamaskiner; Reservestyreplater til bærbar datamaskin; Skjermdigitalisatorer for bærbare datamaskiner
en: Electronics > Electronics Accessories > Computer Components > Laptop Parts: Laptop Cooling Fans & Heat Sinks; Laptop Hinges; Laptop Housings & Trim; Laptop Motherboards & Logic Boards; Laptop Replacement Cables; Laptop Replacement Keyboards; Laptop Replacement Screens; Laptop Replacement Speakers; Laptop Replacement Touchpads; Laptop Screen Digitizers
cs: Elektronika > Elektronika – příslušenství > Počítačové komponenty > Díly k notebookům: Chladicí ventilátory a chladiče pro notebooky; Panty pro notebooky; Šasi notebooků; Základní desky a logické desky pro notebooky; Náhradní kabely k notebookům; Náhradní klávesnice k notebookům; Náhradní displeje k notebookům; Náhradní reproduktory k notebookům; Náhradní touchpady pro notebooky; Digitizéry na displeje notebooků
fi: Elektroniikka > Sähkötarvikkeet > Tietokonekomponentit > Kannettavan tietokoneen osat: Kannettavien jäähdytyspuhaltimet ja -jäähdyttimet; Kannettavan tietokoneen saranat; Kannettavan tietokoneen kotelointi ja viimeistely; Kannettavien emolevyt ja logiikkalevyt; Kannettavan tietokoneen varakaapelit; Kannettavan tietokoneen varanäppäimistöt; Kannettavan tietokoneen varanäytöt; Kannettavan tietokoneen varakaiuttimet; Kannettavien vaihtotouchpadit; Kannettavan tietokoneen näyttösuojat
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 電子配件 > 電腦元件 > 筆記型電腦零件: 筆電散熱風扇與散熱片; 筆電轉軸; 筆記型電腦外殼和邊框; 筆電主機板與邏輯板; 筆記型電腦替換用電線; 筆記型電腦鍵盤模組; 筆電替換面板; 筆記型電腦替換喇叭; 筆電替換觸控板; 筆記型電腦螢幕觸控面板
tr: Elektronik > Elektronik Alet Aksesuarları > Bilgisayar Bileşenleri > Dizüstü Bilgisayar Parçaları: Dizüstü Soğutma Fanları ve Isı Alıcıları; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Menteşeleri; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Kasaları; Dizüstü Anakartları ve Mantık Kartları; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Yedek Kabloları; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Yedek Tuş Takımları; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Yedek Ekranları; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Yedek Hoparlörleri; Dizüstü Yedek Dokunmatik Yüzeyler; Dizüstü Bilgisayar Ekran Dijitalleştiricileri
nl: Elektronica > Accessoires voor elektronica > Computeronderdelen > Laptoponderdelen: Laptop koelventilatoren en koellichamen; Laptopscharnieren; Laptopbehuizingen en -shells; Laptop moederborden en logic boards; Vervangende kabels voor laptops; Vervangende toetsenborden voor laptops; Vervangende schermen voor laptops; Vervangende luidsprekers voor laptops; Laptop vervangingstouchpads; Digitizers voor laptopschermen